Missouri, session 2026, HB2813.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 301.144, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 301.144, to read as follows:
301.144. 1. The director of revenue shall establish and issue special personalized
license plates containing letters or numbers or combinations of letters and numbers. Such
license plates shall be made with fully reflective material with a common color scheme and
design, shall be clearly visible at night, and shall be aesthetically attractive, as prescribed by
section 301.130. Any person desiring to obtain a special personalized license plate for any
motor vehicle the person owns, either solely or jointly, other than an apportioned motor
vehicle or a commercial motor vehicle licensed in excess of twenty-four thousand pounds
gross weight shall apply to the director of revenue on a form provided by the director and
shall pay a fee of [fifteen] fifty dollars in addition to the regular registration fees. The
additional fifty-dollar fee shall be collected only for new or reissued special personalized
license plates and not annually upon the renewal of existing plates. The director of
revenue shall issue rules and regulations setting the standards and establishing the procedure
for application for and issuance of the special personalized license plates and shall provide a
deadline each year for the applications. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined
in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2813 2
applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the
powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the
effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then
the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2001,
shall be invalid and void. No two owners shall be issued identical plates. An owner shall
make a new application and pay a new fee each year such owner desires to obtain or retain
special personalized license plates; however, notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 8
of section 301.130 to the contrary, the director shall allow the special personalized license
plates to be replaced with new plates every three years without any additional charge, above
the fee established in this section, to the renewal applicant. Any person currently in
possession of an approved personalized license plate shall have first priority on that particular
plate for each of the following years that timely and appropriate application is made.
2. Upon application for a personalized plate by the owner of a motor vehicle for
which the owner has no registration plate available for transfer as prescribed by section
301.140, the director shall issue a temporary permit authorizing the operation of the motor
vehicle until the personalized plate is issued.
3. No personalized license plates shall be issued containing any letters, numbers or
combination of letters and numbers which are obscene, profane, patently offensive or
contemptuous of a racial or ethnic group, or offensive to good taste or decency, or would
present an unreasonable danger to the health or safety of the applicant, of other users of
streets and highways, or of the public in any location where the vehicle with such a plate may
be found. The director may recall any personalized license plates, including those issued
prior to August 28, 1992, if the director determines that the plates are obscene, profane,
patently offensive or contemptuous of a racial or ethnic group, or offensive to good taste or
decency, or would present an unreasonable danger to the health or safety of the applicant, of
other users of streets and highways, or of the public in any location where the vehicle with
such a plate may be found. Where the director recalls such plates pursuant to the provisions
of this subsection, the director shall reissue personalized license plates to the owner of the
motor vehicle for which they were issued at no charge, if the new plates proposed by the
owner of the motor vehicle meet the standards established pursuant to this section. The
director shall not apply the provisions of this statute in a way that violates the Missouri or
United States Constitutions as interpreted by the courts with controlling authority in the state
of Missouri. The primary purpose of motor vehicle license plates is to identify motor
vehicles. Nothing in the issuance of a personalized license plate creates a designated or
limited public forum. Nothing contained in this subsection shall be interpreted to prohibit the
use of license plates, which are no longer valid for registration purposes, as collector's items
or for decorative purposes.

HB 2813 3
4. The director may also establish categories of special license plates from which
license plates may be issued. Any such person, other than a person exempted from the
additional fee pursuant to subsection 7 of this section, that desires a personalized special
license plate from any such category shall pay the same additional fee and make the same
kind of application as that required by subsection 1 of this section, and the director shall issue
such plates in the same manner as other personalized special license plates are issued.
5. The director of revenue shall issue to residents of the state of Missouri who hold an
unrevoked and unexpired official amateur radio license issued by the Federal
Communications Commission, upon application and upon payment of the additional fee
specified in subsection 1 of this section, except for a person exempted from the additional fee
pursuant to subsection 7 of this section, personalized special license plates bearing the official
amateur radio call letters assigned by the Federal Communications Commission to the
applicant with the words "AMATEUR RADIO" in place of the words "SHOW-ME STATE".
The application shall be accompanied by a statement stating that the applicant has an
unrevoked and unexpired amateur radio license issued by the Federal Communications
Commission and the official radio call letters assigned by the Federal Communications
Commission to the applicant. An owner making a new application and paying a new fee to
retain an amateur radio license plate may request a replacement plate with the words
"AMATEUR RADIO" in place of the words "SHOW-ME STATE". If application is made to
retain a plate that is three years old or older, the replacement plate shall be issued upon the
payment of required fees.
6. Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, any business that repossesses
motor vehicles or trailers and sells or otherwise disposes of them shall be issued a placard
displaying the word "Repossessed", provided such business pays the license fees presently
required of a manufacturer, distributor, or dealer in section 301.560. Such placard shall bear a
number and shall be in such form as the director of revenue shall determine, and shall be only
used for demonstrations when displayed substantially as provided for number plates on the
rear of the repossessed motor vehicle or trailer.
7. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any person who has retired
from any branch of the United States Armed Forces or reserves, the United States Coast
Guard or reserve, the United States Merchant Marines or reserve, the National Guard, or any
subdivision of any such services shall be exempt from the additional fee required for
personalized license plates issued pursuant to section 301.441. As used in this subsection,
"retired" means having served twenty or more years in the appropriate branch of service and
having received an honorable discharge.
✔